Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1430
In-kind contribution or expenditure, defined.

In-kind contribution or expenditure shall mean a contribution as defined in section 49-1415 or expenditure as defined in subsections (1), (2), and (3) of section 49-1419, other than money.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 30.